Utah statutes.
10-3b-201.   Separate branches of government under a council-mayor form of government.

The powers of municipal government in a municipality operating under the council-mayor form of government are vested in two separate, independent, and equal branches of municipal government consisting of:

(1)  a council composed of five or seven members; and

(2)  a mayor and, under the mayor's supervision, any executive or administrative departments, divisions, and offices and any executive or administrative officers provided for by statute or municipal ordinance.

